Louisiana, session 2026, HB323.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Subpart A of Part I of Chapter 7 of Title 15 of the Louisiana Revised
Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 15:716 through 716.4, is hereby enacted to read as
follows:
SUBPART A. INMATE DEATHS
§716. Definitions
As used in this Subpart, the following terms have the following meanings:
(1) "Correctional facility" means any jail, prison, penitentiary, juvenile
institution, temporary holding center, or detention facility.
(2) "Department" means the Department of Public Safety and Corrections.
Page 1 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-947 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 323
(3) "Immediate family member" means the spouse, parents, children,
siblings, grandparents, grandchildren, or legal guardian of a deceased inmate.
(4) "Supervisor" means the warden, facility administrator, or designated
official at a correctional facility.
§716.1. Inmate deaths; notification procedures
A.(1) Each supervisor shall do all of the following upon discovery that the
death of an inmate has occurred at a correctional facility:
(a) Immediately notify the department.
(b) Immediately notify the coroner of the parish where the correctional
facility is located, thoroughly document any attempts to contact the coroner, and
provide the coroner with all known circumstances surrounding the death of the
inmate.
(c)(i) Promptly notify an immediate family member. Notification shall be
provided no later than twelve hours after the confirmed time of death and shall never
be provided between the hours of midnight and 6:00 a.m.
(ii) Immediately after notification, the supervisor shall share with the
immediate family member a written letter of condolence that includes the
circumstances of the death and the available information.
(d) Investigate the death and make a good faith effort to obtain and include
all facts relevant to the death within the comprehensive report that is to be submitted
pursuant to Paragraph (2) of this Subsection.
(2)(a) A preliminary report for each inmate death shall be issued in
accordance with the critical incident reporting requirements of the department and
shall be shared with the immediate family member at no cost.
(b)(i) A supervisor shall prepare and make publicly available a
comprehensive report within thirty days of the death of an inmate. The report shall
be submitted to both the attorney general and the division of prison operations within
the department and be made available through a link on the applicable website of the
department, correctional facility, or sheriff's office.
Page 2 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-947 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 323
(ii) The report shall include but not be limited to all of the following
information:
(aa) The name of the deceased inmate.
(bb) The age of the deceased inmate.
(cc) The race of the deceased inmate.
(dd) The gender of the deceased inmate.
(ee) The date and time of the inmate's death.
(ff) The facility and housing area of the inmate at time of death.
(gg) The preliminary cause of the inmate's death.
(hh) A brief statement of the circumstances that led to the inmate's death.
(ii) An identification of which independent agency is investigating the death.
(jj) Any other facts relevant to the death of the inmate.
B. No person involved in any act that is connected to the death of an inmate
shall participate in notifying or contacting an immediate family member.
C. The department shall immediately appoint an independent investigator or
investigative entity to examine the circumstances of the death and to pursue any
necessary charges or administrative action.
D. The division of prison operations within the department shall do all of the
following:
(1) Review any systemic issues that may have contributed to the death of the
inmate and release a public report with recommendations for preventative measures
to prevent future deaths.
(2) Work in coordination with the Louisiana Department of Health to assess
the quality of medical care provided to any inmate who was receiving medical
treatment for an issue related to the cause of death.
E. The provisions of this Section do not apply if the death of an inmate is
caused by any of the following:
(1) Natural causes while attended by a physician or a registered nurse.
(2) A sentence of death imposed pursuant to R.S. 15:569.
Page 3 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-947 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 323
F. Whoever intentionally fails to comply with the provisions of Subsection
A of this Section shall be imprisoned for not more than six months, fined not more
than one thousand dollars, or both.
§716.2. Inmate deaths; natural causes
A supervisor or the department shall immediately attempt to notify an
immediate family member when an inmate dies of natural causes while attended by
a physician or a registered nurse. Upon successful notification, a supervisor or the
department shall inform the immediate family member of all of the following:
(1) That the inmate has died.
(2) The time of the inmate's death.
(3) That an autopsy will be conducted on the inmate, unless the immediate
family member provides an objection to the department within eight hours of the
stated time of death.
§716.3. Data collection
The Louisiana Department of Health shall collect all of the following data for
an annual analysis of all inmate deaths:
(1) The cause of death.
(2) The manner of death.
(3) The trial status of the inmate.
(4) The race of the inmate.
(5) The age of the inmate.
(6) The gender of the inmate.
(7) The length of incarceration.
(8) The type of facility where the inmate was housed.
§716.4. Reporting
A. The department and the Louisiana Sheriffs' Association shall jointly
produce a public report on an annual basis that analyzes and summarizes the
aggregate data, categorized by facility, of inmate deaths with all of the following
information:
Page 4 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-947 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 323
(1) The total number of deaths.
(2) The race of each deceased inmate.
(3) The gender of each deceased inmate.
(4) The age of each deceased inmate
(5) The criminal record of each deceased inmate.
(6) The trial status of each deceased inmate.
(7) The cause of each inmate's death.
(8) The date of each inmate's death.
(9) The amount of time each inmate was housed at the facility where the
death occurred.
B. Each supervisor shall collect all data on inmate deaths, if applicable to his
correctional facility, in a timely fashion and through standardized instruments and
submit this data to the department and the Louisiana Sheriffs' Association for
inclusion within the annual report.
C. The department shall publish the annual report on its website and make
the report available for publishing on the website of each correctional facility no later
than December thirty-first of each year.
Section 2. R.S. 40:34.10(introductory paragraph) is hereby amended and reenacted
and R.S. 40:34.10(20) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§34.10. Death certificate; required contents
The certificate of death shall contain, as at a minimum, all of the following
items:
* * *
(20) Whether the person died while in prison or while serving a sentence, if
applicable.
Page 5 of 7
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-947 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 323